incubator/apertium-cy-kw.kw.dix
<!-- 

  This dictionary appears to have Kemmyn in the paradigm definitions and Unified
  in the entries :(

  Use with _extreme_ caution.

-->
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/>

    <sdef n="m" c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f" c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mf" c="Masculine-Feminine"/>

    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular / Plural"/>

    <sdef n="prn"  c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="subj" c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="pos"  c="Possessive"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="p1" c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2" c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3" c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="ind" c="Indefinite"/>    
    <sdef n="def" c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="pr"   c="Preposition"/>
 
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/>

    <sdef n="det" c="Determiner"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Gradh treylyans -->

    <pardef n="initial-p">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>p</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-b">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-m">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>m</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-t">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>t</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-d">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dh</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-ch">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>ch</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>ch</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>ch</l>
          <r>ch</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-k">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>k</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>h</l>
          <r>k</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>k</l>
          <r>k</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-g">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>h</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>g</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-gw">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gw</l>
          <r>gw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>w</l>
          <r>gw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>kw</l>
          <r>gw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>hw</l>
          <r>gw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>gw</l>
          <r>gw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="initial-K">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>K</l>
          <r>K</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>G</l>
          <r>K</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>H</l>
          <r>K</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>K</l>
          <r>L</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- TODO: Finish adding capitalised mutation paradigms -->

    <!-- Pronouns -->

    <!-- Alternatively: my, ty, ev, hi, ni, hwi, i -->
    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>che</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>eve</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hye</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nye</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>why</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>angye</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gye</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pronoms de subject"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="golow"><par n="initial-g"/><i>olow</i><par n="owr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tre"><par n="initial-t"/><i>re</i><par n="tre__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marner"><par n="initial-m"/><i>arner</i><par n="amary__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pysen"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ys</i><par n="pys/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="delen"><par n="initial-d"/><i>el</i><par n="del/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dyscajor"><par n="initial-d"/><i>yscajor</i><par n="Kernow__n"/></e>
    <e lm="myrgh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>yrgh</i><par n="benen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="benen"><par n="initial-b"/><i>enen</i><par n="benen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prys"><par n="initial-p"/><i>rys</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ganow"><par n="initial-g"/><i>anow</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bosty"><par n="initial-b"/><i>osty</i><par n="pen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trevas"><par n="initial-t"/><i>revas</i><par n="padel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chy"><par n="initial-ch"/><i>y</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwyns"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>y</i><par n="gwy/ns__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tokyn"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ok</i><par n="tok/yn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwary"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ary</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deneren"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eneren</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
    <e lm="map"><par n="initial-m"/><i></i><par n="m/ap__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plans"><par n="initial-p"/><i>lans</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kyst"><par n="initial-k"/><i>yst</i><par n="lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bugh"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ugh</i><par n="bugh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="myghtern"><par n="initial-m"/><i>yghtern</i><par n="myghtern__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kembres"><par n="initial-K"/><i>embres</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwrek"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>r</i><par n="gwr/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bys"><par n="initial-b"/><i></i><par n="b/ys__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kynyow"><par n="initial-k"/><i>yny</i><par n="kyny/ow__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pendra"><par n="initial-p"/><i>endr</i><par n="pendr/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kert"><par n="initial-k"/><i>ert</i><par n="owr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trigva"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rigva</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kernewes"><par n="initial-K"/><i>ernewes</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gon"><par n="initial-g"/><i>on</i><par n="gon__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuhudhor"><par n="initial-k"/><i>uhudhor</i><par n="Kernow__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kyttryn"><par n="initial-k"/><i>yttryn</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwedhen"><par n="initial-gw"/><i></i><par n="gw/edhen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kembro"><par n="initial-K"/><i>embr</i><par n="Kembr/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ton"><par n="initial-t"/><i>on</i><par n="pen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwarier"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ari</i><par n="pront/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dans"><par n="initial-d"/><i></i><par n="d/ans__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plat"><par n="initial-p"/><i>lat</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beth"><par n="initial-b"/><i>e</i><par n="be/th__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ke"><par n="initial-k"/><i>e</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tron"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ron</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ger"><par n="initial-g"/><i>er</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tanbren"><par n="initial-t"/><i>anbren</i><par n="tanbren__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kegyn"><par n="initial-k"/><i>egyn</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bagas"><par n="initial-b"/><i>agas</i><par n="bagas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gerlyver"><par n="initial-g"/><i>erly</i><par n="ly/ver__n"/></e>
    <e lm="myghternes"><par n="initial-m"/><i>yghternes</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kreunell"><par n="initial-k"/><i>reunell</i><par n="mos__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tour"><par n="initial-t"/><i>our</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwennol"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>enn</i><par n="gwenn/ol__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pyth"><par n="initial-p"/><i>yth</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dewotty"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ewotty</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwythyas"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ythya</i><par n="gwythya/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bledhen"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ledh</i><par n="bledh/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grappa"><par n="initial-g"/><i>rapp</i><par n="mapp/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pobel"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ob</i><par n="pob/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="morthol"><par n="initial-m"/><i>orthol</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deth"><par n="initial-d"/><i>e</i><par n="de/th__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dynsor"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ynsor</i><par n="Kernow__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gorsaf"><par n="initial-g"/><i>orsa</i><par n="le/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gorhel"><par n="initial-g"/><i>orh</i><par n="gorh/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pronter"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ront</i><par n="pront/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meneth"><par n="initial-m"/><i>en</i><par n="men/eth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kernow"><par n="initial-K"/><i>ernow</i><par n="Kernow__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mys"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ys</i><par n="tu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="broder"><par n="initial-b"/><i>r</i><par n="br/oder__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chambour"><par n="initial-ch"/><i>ambour</i><par n="amary__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dyscas"><par n="initial-d"/><i>yscas</i><par n="oy__n"/></e>
